South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4971.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 5, Title 57 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 57-5-200.  (A) By December 31, 2028, the Department of Transportation shall transfer ownership of all roads that are one half mile or less to the county in which it is located. Roads transferred to counties pursuant to this section must be maintained by the county in which it is located, meet the state highway maintenance standards, and remain in a state of good repair. The department shall determine, in consultation with the receiving counties, the manner in which the provisions of this section are implemented to provide the most efficient transfer of ownership. (B) The department shall transfer sufficient funds to a county that receives additional roads to maintain. SECTION 2.  Section 12-28-2740(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) At least twenty-five percent of a county's apportionment of "C" funds, based on a biennial averaging of expenditures, must be expended on the state highway system for construction, improvements, and maintenance. The Department of Transportation shall administer all funds expended on the state highway system unless the department has given explicit authority to a county or municipal government or other agent acting on behalf of the county transportation committee to design, engineer, construct, and inspect projects using their own personnel. The county transportation committee, at its discretion, may expend up to seventy-five percent of "C" construction funds for activities including other local paving or improving county roads, for street and traffic signs, and for other road and bridge projects. Reserved. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----